Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB378.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "smart meter" means a time-based digital meter and
related communication equipment capable of being part of a system that receives,
stores, measures and records electricity usage data on a time-differentiated basis
and provides two-way communication for real-time monitoring of electricity
consumption.
(2) A retail electric supplier shall give not less than thirty (30) days written notice to
its electric customer before commencing to replace that customer's existing
analog electric meter with a smart meter. If the customers owns the premises
upon which the meter is to be installed, he or she shall have thirty (30) days to opt
out of having the smart meter installed. The right to opt out of a smart meter
installation shall not apply to a customer whose meter is not recording the
electricity used at the premises accurately or the electric meter is otherwise
malfunctioning.
(3) Customers of the retail electric supplier shall not be charged:
(a) For the installation of the smart meter by the retail electric supplier or by
any company contracted by the electric retail supplier; or
(b) A surcharge or fee for opting out of having the smart meter installed.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/13/2026 3:34 PM Jacketed